Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 1
AMENDMENT OF ARTICLES OF INCORPORATION

7-110-101. Authority to amend articles of incorporation.

A corporation may amend its articles of incorporation at any time to add or change a provision that is required or permitted in the articles of incorporation or to delete a provision not required in the articles of incorporation. Whether a provision is required or permitted in the articles of incorporation is determined as of the effective date of the amendment.

A shareholder does not have a vested property right resulting from any provision in the articles of incorporation, including any provision relating to management, control, capital structure, dividend entitlement, purpose, or duration of the corporation.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 794, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

7-110-102. Amendment of articles of incorporation by board of directors.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, the board of directors may adopt, without shareholder action, one or more amendments to the articles of incorporation to:

Delete the statement of the names and addresses of the incorporators or of the initial directors;

Delete the statement of the registered agent name and registered agent address of the initial registered agent, if a statement of change changing the registered agent name and registered agent address of the registered agent is on file in the records of the secretary of state;

Delete the statement of the principal office address of the initial principal office, if a statement of change changing the principal office address is on file in the records of the secretary of state;

Delete the statement of the names and addresses of any or all of the individuals named in the articles of incorporation, pursuant to section 7-90-301 (6), as being individuals who caused the articles of incorporation to be delivered for filing;

Repealed.

Change the domestic entity name of the corporation by substituting the word "corporation", "incorporated", "company", or "limited", or an abbreviation of any thereof for a similar word or abbreviation in the domestic entity name, or by adding, deleting, or changing a geographical attribution; or

Make any other change expressly permitted by articles 101 to 117 of this title to be made without shareholder action.

The board of directors may adopt, without shareholder action, one or more amendments to the articles of incorporation to change the domestic entity name of the corporation, if necessary, in connection with the reinstatement of a corporation pursuant to part 10 of article 90 of this title.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 795, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 96:

(1)(c) repealed, p. 1320, § 26, effective June 1.

L. 2000:

(1)(d) and (2) amended, p. 978, § 60, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), and (2) amended and (1)(b.5) added, p. 2321, § 248, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1)(b) and (1)(d) amended and (1)(b.3) added, p. 1502, § 270, effective July 1.

7-110-103. Amendment of articles of incorporation by board of directors and shareholders.

The board of directors or the holders of shares representing at least ten percent of all of the votes entitled to be cast on the amendment may propose an amendment to the articles of incorporation for submission to the shareholders.

For an amendment to the articles of incorporation to be adopted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section:

The board of directors shall recommend the amendment to the shareholders unless the amendment is proposed by shareholders or unless the board of directors determines that, because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances, it should make no recommendation and communicates the basis for its determination to the shareholders with the amendment; and

The shareholders entitled to vote on the amendment shall approve the amendment as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

The proposing board of directors or the proposing shareholders may condition the effectiveness of the amendment on any basis.

The corporation shall give notice, in accordance with section 7-107-105, to each shareholder entitled to vote on the amendment of the shareholders' meeting at which the amendment will be voted upon. The notice of the meeting shall state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the amendment, and the notice shall contain or be accompanied by a copy or a summary of the amendment.

Unless articles 101 to 117 of this title (including the provisions of section 7-117-101 (7)), the articles of incorporation, bylaws adopted by the shareholders, or the proposing board of directors or the proposing shareholders acting pursuant to subsection (3) of this section require a greater vote, the amendment shall be approved by the votes required by sections 7-107-206 and 7-107-207 by the voting groups entitled to vote on the amendment.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 795, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 96:

(5) amended, p. 1320, § 27, effective June 1.

7-110-104. Voting on amendments of articles of incorporation by voting groups.

If shareholder voting is otherwise required by articles 101 to 117 of this title, the holders of the shares of a class are entitled to vote as a separate voting group on an amendment if the amendment would:

Increase or decrease the aggregate number of authorized shares of the class;

Effect an exchange or reclassification of all or part of the shares of the class into shares of another class;

Effect an exchange or reclassification, or create the right of exchange, of all or part of the shares of another class into shares of the class;

Change the designation, preferences, limitations, or relative rights of all or part of the shares of the class;

Change the shares of all or part of the class into a different number of shares of the same class;

Create a new class of shares having rights or preferences with respect to distributions or dissolution that are prior, superior, or substantially equal to the shares of the class;

Increase the rights, preferences, or number of authorized shares of any class that, after giving effect to the amendment, have rights or preferences with respect to distributions or to dissolution that are prior, superior, or substantially equal to the shares of the class;

Limit or deny an existing preemptive right of all or part of the shares of the class; or

Cancel or otherwise affect rights to distributions or dividends that have accumulated but have not yet been declared on all or part of the shares of the class.

If an amendment would affect a series of a class of shares in one or more of the ways described in subsection (1) of this section, the shares of that series are entitled to vote as a separate voting group on the amendment.

If an amendment that entitles two or more series of a class of shares to vote as separate voting groups under this section would affect those two or more series in the same or a substantially similar way, the shares of all the series so affected shall, instead, vote together as a single voting group on the amendment.

A class or series of shares is entitled to the voting rights granted by this section notwithstanding any provision in the articles of incorporation that the shares are nonvoting shares.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 796, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

7-110-105. Amendment of articles of incorporation before issuance of shares.

If a corporation has not yet issued shares, its board of directors or, if no directors have been elected, its incorporators may adopt one or more amendments to the articles of incorporation.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 797, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

7-110-106. Articles of amendment to articles of incorporation.

A corporation amending its articles of incorporation shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, articles of amendment stating:

The domestic entity name of the corporation;

The text of each amendment adopted; and

If the amendment provides for an exchange, reclassification, or cancellation of issued shares, provisions for implementing the amendment if not contained in the amendment itself.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 797, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2002:

IP(1) amended, p. 1848, § 115, effective July 1; IP(1) amended, p. 1713, § 115, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

IP(1) and (1)(a) amended, p. 2321, § 249, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1)(d), (1)(e), and (1)(f) repealed, p. 1502, § 271, effective July 1.

7-110-107. Restated articles of incorporation.

The board of directors may restate the articles of incorporation at any time with or without shareholder action. If the corporation has not yet issued shares and no directors have been elected, its incorporators may restate the articles of incorporation at any time.

The restatement may include one or more amendments to the articles of incorporation. If the restatement includes an amendment requiring shareholder approval, it shall be adopted as provided in section 7-110-103.

If the board of directors submits a restatement for shareholder action, the corporation shall give notice, in accordance with section 7-107-105, to each shareholder entitled to vote on the restatement of the shareholders' meeting at which the restatement will be voted upon. The notice shall state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the restatement, and the notice shall contain or be accompanied by a copy of the restatement that identifies any amendment or other change it would make in the articles of incorporation.

A corporation restating its articles of incorporation shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, articles of restatement stating:

The domestic entity name of the corporation;

The text of the restated articles of incorporation;

Repealed.

If the restatement was adopted by the board of directors or incorporators without shareholder action, a statement to that effect and that shareholder action was not required.

Upon filing by the secretary of state or at any later effective date determined pursuant to section 7-90-304, restated articles of incorporation supersede the original articles of incorporation and all prior amendments to them.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 798, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2002:

IP(4) and (5) amended, p. 1848, § 116, effective July 1; IP(4) and (5) amended, p. 1713, § 116, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

IP(4) and (4)(a) amended, p. 2322, § 250, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(4)(c) repealed, p. 1503, § 272, effective July 1.

7-110-108. Amendment of articles of incorporation pursuant to reorganization.

Articles of incorporation may be amended, without action by the board of directors or shareholders, to carry out a plan of reorganization ordered or decreed by a court of competent jurisdiction under a statute of the United States if the articles of incorporation after amendment contain only provisions required or permitted by section 7-102-102.

For an amendment to the articles of incorporation to be made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, an individual or individuals designated by the court shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, articles of amendment stating:

The domestic entity name of the corporation;

The text of each amendment approved by the court;

The date of the court's order or decree approving the articles of amendment;

The title of the reorganization proceeding in which the order or decree was entered; and

A statement that the court had jurisdiction of the proceeding under a specified statute of the United States.

Shareholders of a corporation undergoing reorganization do not have dissenters' rights except as provided in the reorganization plan.

This section does not apply after entry of a final decree in the reorganization proceeding even though the court retains jurisdiction of the proceeding for limited purposes unrelated to consummation of the reorganization plan.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 799, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2002:

IP(2) amended, p. 1849, § 117, effective July 1; IP(2) amended, p. 1713, § 117, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

IP(2) and (2)(a) amended, p. 2322, § 251, effective July 1, 2004.

7-110-109. Effect of amendment of articles of incorporation.

An amendment to the articles of incorporation does not affect any existing right of persons other than shareholders, any cause of action existing against or in favor of the corporation, or any proceeding to which the corporation is a party. An amendment changing a corporation's domestic entity name does not abate a proceeding brought by or against a corporation in its former entity name.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 799, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 979, § 61, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2322, § 252, effective July 1, 2004.